District of Columbia statutes.
Omitted

47-2886.06

District of Columbia Board of Registration for Professional Engineers — Compensation.

Omitted.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 47-2886.13.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-2306.

Editor's Notes

The provisions of former § 2-2306 1981 Ed. have been omitted as obsolete, the Board referred to herein having been abolished.

Board of Registration for Professional Engineers abolished. See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 47-2886.05.

Section 302 of D.C. Law 19-171 enacted this subchapter into law.